North Carolina, session 2025, SB369.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, shall ensure that a health care provider duly licensed by the State that provides health
care services exclusively through telehealth services shall not be required to maintain a physical
presence in the State to be considered an eligible provider for enrollment as a Medicaid provider.
SECTION 2. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, shall ensure that a health care provider group with health care providers duly licensed
by the State which exclusively offers telehealth services shall not be required to have an in-State
service address to be eligible to enroll as a Medicaid provider group.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S369-v-2*